Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-262
Common carriers; provide services; terms and conditions.

Common carriers may provide intrastate transmission, under either contract or tariff, for pay-per-call services only under the terms and conditions set forth by the Intrastate Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act.

Laws 1993, LB 42, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1103;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 124.